Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-235
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 57-235 to 57-239, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Mineral interests shall mean mines, minerals, quarries, mineral springs and wells, oil and gas wells, and overriding royalty interests and production payments with respect to oil or gas leases; and

(2) Surface estate shall mean any real property, real estate, or lands including all city and village lots and all other lands except mineral interests.

Laws 1981, LB 59, § 1.